Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.640

Drug control assistance unit—Certain investigators exempt from state civil service act.

Any investigators employed pursuant to RCW 43.43.610 shall be exempt from the state civil service act, chapter 41.06 RCW.

[ 1980 c 69 s 3; 1970 ex.s. c 63 s 5.]